Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-12,135
Information regarding activities; department; report.

The Department of Economic Development shall submit information regarding its activities under the
Nebraska Operational Assistance Act as part of
the department's annual status report under section 81-1201.11.

Laws 2007, LB425, § 7;

Laws 2011, LB404, § 8.